src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON ANSUFF_SG !!= * @CODE@
< "+Px1Sg":%^POS          "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Sg":%^POS          "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Sg":%^POS      "@U.noun.3sg@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Sg":%^POS  0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px1Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:n 0:â 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
<"+Px12Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:n 0:a 0:w "@U.noun.12pl@" > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4pl@" > OBVIATIVE ; ! 

LEXICON ANSUFF_0POSS !!= * @CODE@
< "+Px1Sg":%^POS         "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Sg":%^POS         "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Sg":%^POS         "@U.noun.3sg@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px1Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n 0:â 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
<"+Px12Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n 0:a 0:w "@U.noun.12pl@" > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4pl@" > OBVIATIVE ; ! 

LEXICON SG_OBV !!= * @CODE@
  SG_ ;
  OBVIATIVE ;
  
  

LEXICON ANSUFF_Pl_0POSS !!= * @CODE@
< "+Px1Sg":%^POS 0:a  0:k       "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Sg":%^POS 0:a  0:k      "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Sg":%^POS       "@U.noun.3sg@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w 0:a "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px1Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n 0:â 0:n 0:a 0:k "@U.noun.1pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
<"+Px12Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n 0:a 0:w 0:a 0:k "@U.noun.12pl@" > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w 0:a 0:k "@U.noun.2pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w 0:a "@U.noun.3pl@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w 0:a "@U.noun.4pl@" > OBVIATIVE ; ! 


LEXICON ANSUFF_PL !!= * @CODE@
< "+Px1Sg":%^POS  0:a 0:k        "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Sg":%^POS  0:a 0:k        "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Sg":%^POS    "@U.noun.3sg@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Sg":%^POS  0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px1Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:n 0:â 0:n 0:a 0:k "@U.noun.1pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
<"+Px12Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:n 0:a 0:w 0:a 0:k "@U.noun.12pl@" > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px2Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w 0:a 0:k "@U.noun.2pl@"  > SG_OBV ; !
< "+Px3Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4pl@" > OBVIATIVE ; ! 

LEXICON PL_OBV !!= * @CODE@
  PLak ;
  OBVIATIVE ;



!LEXICON ANSUFF_LOC
!< "+Px1Sg":%^POS         "@U.noun.1sg@"  > LOC ; !
!< "+Px2Sg":%^POS         "@U.noun.2sg@"  > LOC ; !
!< "+Px3Sg":%^POS         "@U.noun.3sg@"  > LOC ; !
!< "+Px4Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y "@U.noun.4sg@" > LOC ; !
!< "+Px1Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > LOCahk ;   ! 
!<"+Px12Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n "@U.noun.12pl@" > LOCahk ; ! 
!< "+Px2Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > LOCahk ; !
!< "+Px3Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > LOCahk ; !
!< "+Px4Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:y "@U.noun.4sg@" > LOC ; ! 




!! !!Inanimate possessive suffixes


LEXICON INSUFF_SG !!= * @CODE@ 
< "+Px1Sg":%^POS                  "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_ ; !
< "+Px2Sg":%^POS                  "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_ ; !
< "+Px3Sg":%^POS                  "@U.noun.3sg@"  > SG_ ; !
< "+Px4Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > SG_ ; !
< "+Px1Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:n 0:â 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > SG_ ;   ! exclusive Pl
< "+Px12Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n 0:a 0:w "@U.noun.12pl@" > SG_ ; ! inclusive Pl
< "+Px2Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > SG_ ; !
< "+Px3Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > SG_ ; !
< "+Px4Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > SG_ ; !


LEXICON INSUFF_PL !!= * @CODE@ 
< "+Px1Sg":%^POS                   "@U.noun.1sg@"  > PLa ; !
< "+Px2Sg":%^POS                   "@U.noun.2sg@"  > PLa ; !
< "+Px3Sg":%^POS                   "@U.noun.3sg@"  > PLa ; !
< "+Px4Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w  "@U.noun.4sg@" > PLa ; !
< "+Px1Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:n 0:â 0:n  "@U.noun.1pl@"  > PLa ;   ! exclusive Pl
< "+Px12Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n 0:a 0:w  "@U.noun.12pl@" > PLa ; ! inclusive Pl
< "+Px2Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w  "@U.noun.2pl@"  > PLa ; !
< "+Px3Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w  "@U.noun.3pl@"  > PLa ; !
< "+Px4Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w      "@U.noun.4sg@" > PLa ; ! obviative plural possessor



LEXICON INSUFF_LOC !!= * @CODE@
< "+Px1Sg":%^POS                  "@U.noun.1sg@"  > LOC ; !
< "+Px2Sg":%^POS                  "@U.noun.2sg@"  > LOC ; !
< "+Px3Sg":%^POS                  "@U.noun.3sg@"  > LOC ; !
< "+Px4Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y "@U.noun.4sg@" > LOC ; !
< "+Px1Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > LOCahk ;   ! exclusive Pl
< "+Px12Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n "@U.noun.12pl@" > LOCahk ; ! inclusive Pl
< "+Px2Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > LOCahk ; !
< "+Px3Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:w "@U.noun.3pl@"  > LOCahk ; !
< "+Px4Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:y "@U.noun.4sg@" > LOC ; ! obviative plural possessor


LEXICON ANiySUFF_SG  !!= * @CODE@
< "+Px1Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y                 "@U.noun.1sg@"  > SG_ ; !
< "+Px2Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y                 "@U.noun.2sg@"  > SG_ ; !
< "+Px3Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y                "@U.noun.3sg@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !The continuation lexicon adds an -a as a suffix to mark the obviative, since this is a 3-3 situation
< "+Px4Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w "@U.noun.4sg@" > OBVIATIVE ; !The continuation lexicon adds an -a as a suffix to mark the obviative, since this is a 3-3 situation
< "+Px1Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:n 0:â 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  > SG_ ; ! exclusive Pl
< "+Px12Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n 0:a 0:w "@U.noun.12pl@" > SG_ ; ! inclusive Pl
< "+Px2Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  > SG_ ; !
< "+Px3Pl":%^POS 0:i  0:w 0:â 0:w    "@U.noun.3pl@"  > OBVIATIVE ; !The continuation lexicon adds an -a as a suffix to mark the obviative, since this is a 3-3 situation
< "+Px4Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w   "@U.noun.4pl@" > OBVIATIVE ; ! obviative plural possessor, requires final -a


LEXICON ANiySUFF_PL !!= * @CODE@
< "+Px1Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y                 "@U.noun.1sg@"  >  PLak ; !
< "+Px2Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y                  "@U.noun.2sg@"  >  PLak ; !
< "+Px3Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y         "@U.noun.3sg@"  >  OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Sg":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w  "@U.noun.4sg@" >  OBVIATIVE ; !obviative plural possessor, hence Pl is -a
< "+Px1Pl":%^POS  0:i 0:n 0:â 0:n "@U.noun.1pl@"  >  PLak ;   ! exclusive Pl
< "+Px12Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:n 0:a 0:w     "@U.noun.12pl@" >  PLak ; ! inclusive Pl
< "+Px2Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w "@U.noun.2pl@"  >  PLak ; !
< "+Px3Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:w 0:â 0:w     "@U.noun.3pl@"  >  OBVIATIVE ; !
< "+Px4Pl":%^POS 0:i 0:y 0:i 0:w    "@U.noun.4sg@" >  OBVIATIVE ; ! obviative plural possessor, hence Pl is -a


!! !!Singular/plural suffixes



LEXICON SG_ !!= * @CODE@ 
 # ;


LEXICON PLa !!= * @CODE@ 
:%>a # ;


LEXICON PLak !!= * @CODE@ 
:%>ak # ;


!! !!Locative suffixes

LEXICON LOC !!= * @CODE@ 
+Loc:%>i%^LOChk  # ;

LEXICON LOCahk !!= * @CODE@ 
+Loc:%>â%^LOChk  # ;

LEXICON LOCinaahk !!= * @CODE@ For collective locative
+Loc:%>inâ%^LOChk  # ;

!! !!Obviative suffix
LEXICON OBVIATIVE !!= * @CODE@
+Obv:%>a # ;


!! !!Special cases
LEXICON NOPREFIX !!= * @CODE@ gives diacr.flag for no prefix. Used for hardcoded forms in the lexicon
< "@U.noun.abs@" > # ;
